en: E123, Amaranth, FD&C Red 2
xx: E123
bg: E123, Амарант
ca: E123, Amarant
cs: E123, Amarant
da: E123, Amaranth
de: E123, Amaranth
el: E123, Αμαρανθη
es: E123, Amaranto
et: E123, Amarant
fi: E123, Amarantti, Amaranttia
fr: E123, Amarante
hu: E123, Amarant, Amaranth
it: E123, Amaranto
lt: E123, Amarantas
lv: E123, Amarants
mt: E123, Amarant
nl: E123, Amarant
pl: E123, Amarant
pt: E123, vermelho amaranto, Amarante, Amaranto
ro: E123, Amarant
sk: E123, Amarant
sl: E123, Amarant
sv: E123, Amarant

en: E124, Ponceau 4r, cochineal red a, CI Food Red 7, Brilliant Scarlet 4R, Ponceau
xx: E124
bg: E124, Понсо 4r, кохинил червено а, CI хранително червено 7
ca: E124, Vermell cotxinilla A, Vermell Ponceau 4R
cs: E124, Ponceau 4r, košenilová červeň a, CI potravinářská červeň 7
da: E124, Ponceau 4r (cochenillerød a), CI Food Red 7, Ponceau 4R
de: E124, Cochenillerot a (ponceau 4r), Food Red 7, Cochenillerot A
el: E124, Πονσω 4r, ερυθρο της κοχενιλης α, Κόκκινο CI food 7
es: E124, Ponceau 4r, rojo cochinilla a
et: E124, Erkpunane 4r, košenillpunane a, CI punane toiduvärv 7, erkpunane
fi: E124, Uuskokkiini, Uuskokkiinia, kokkeniilipunainen a, Ponceau 4r, CI Food Red 7
fr: E124, Ponceau 4R, Rouge cochenille A, cochenille nouvelle, CI No. 16255, CI Food Red 7, CAS 2611-28-7, rouge ponceau
hu: E124, Ponceau 4R, Kosnilvörös A, CI Food Red 7, Neukokcin
it: E124, Ponceau 4r, rosso cocciniglia a, CI rosso per alimenti 7
lt: E124, Ponso 4r, košenilis raudonasis a, Maistinis raudonasis CI Nr. 7, Raudonasis ponso
lv: E124, Kumačs 4r, košinela sarkanais a, CI Pārtikas sarkanais 7
mt: E124, Ponceau 4r, aħmar tal-kuċċinilja a
nl: E124, Ponceau 4r, cochenillerood a, CI Food Red 7
pl: E124, Pąs 4r, czerwień koszenilowa a, CI czerwień spożywcza 7
pt: E124, Ponceau 4r, vermelho de cochonilha a, Vermelho alimentar CI 7
ro: E124, Ponceau 4r, Coșenilă roșie a, Colorant alimentar roșu CI 7, Roșu ponceau
sk: E124, Ponceau 4r, košenilová červeň a, CI potravinárska červená 7
sl: E124, Rdeče 4r, košenil rdeče a
sv: E124, Nykockin, CI Food Red 7, ponceau 4R

en: E125, Scarlet GN, C.I. Food Red 1, Ponceau SX, FD&C Red No. 4, C.I. 14700
xx: E125, Scarlet GN, C.I. Food Red 1, Ponceau SX, FD&C Red No. 4, C.I. 14700
es: E125, Ponceau SX, E 125
fi: E125, Skarletti GN, CI 14700
fr: E125, Ponceau SX, Écarlate GN, C18H14N2Na2O7S2, Scarlet GN
pl: E125, Szkarłat GN
ro: E125, Ponceau SX

xx: E126, Ponceau 6R
en: E126, Ponceau 6R
fr: E126, Ponceau GR, Ponceau 6R
hu: E126, Ponszó 6R
pl: E126, Pąs 6R

en: E127, Erythrosine, FD&C Red 3, FD & C Red No.3, Red No. 3, FD&C Red no3, FD and C Red 3, Red 3, Red 3 lake
xx: E127
bg: E127, Еритрозин
ca: E127, Eritrosina
cs: E127, Erythrosin, Erytrosin, E 127
da: E127, Erythrosin
de: E127, Erythrosin, E 127
el: E127, Ερυθροσινη
es: E127, Eritrosina, Iodoeosina
et: E127, Erütrosiin
fa: E127, اریتروسین
fi: E127, Erytrosiini, Erytrosiinia
fr: E127, Érythrosine, erythrosine, C.I. 45430, C.I. Acid Red 51, Acid Red 51, C.I. Food Red 14, CAS 568-63-8, FD & C Red No.3, Red No. 3, FD&C No.3 rouge, nourriture No.3 rouge, Erythrosine, Erythrosine B, Erythrosin B, C.I. 45430, Tetraiodofluorescein Sodium Salt, Calcoid Erythrosine N, C.I. Food Red 14, Aizen Erythrosine, Indian Standards No. 1697, Acid Red 51, Pyrosin B, Tetraiodofluorescein, Eosin J, Iodoeosin, 568-63-8, C20H6I4Na2O5
hu: E127, Eritrozin
it: E127, Eritrosina, C20H6I4Na2O5
ja: E127, エリスロシン
lt: E127, Eritrozinas
lv: E127, Eritrozīns
mk: E127, Еритрозин
mt: E127, Eritrosina
nl: E127, Erytrosine, Erythrosine
pl: E127, Erytrozyna
pt: E127, Eritrosina
ro: E127, Eritrozină
ru: E127, эритрозин
sh: E127, Eritrozin
sk: E127, Erytrozín
sl: E127, Eritrozin
sr: E127, Eritrozin
sv: E127, Erytrosin, E 127
uk: E127, Еритрозин
zh: E127, 赤藓红

en: E128, Red 2G
xx: E128
bg: E128, E128 food additive
ca: E128, Vermell 2G
cs: E128, E128 food additive
da: E128, Rød 2G
de: E128, Rot 2G, E 128, Red 2G, Roth 2G
el: E128, E128 food additive
es: E128, Rojo 2G
et: E128, E128 food additive
fi: E128, Punainen 2G, Atsogeraniini, E 128, Dinatrium 5-asetamido-4-okso-3-(fenyylihydratsinyylideeni)naftaleeni-2\,7-disulfonaatti, CI 18050
fr: E128, Rouge 2G, CI Food Red 10, Azogéranine, CI No. 18050, CAS 3734-67-6, Red 2G, C.I. 18050, Azophloxine, Azofloxin, Amidonaphthol red G, Acid Red 1, CI Acid Red 1, D&C Red 11, Azo Geranine 2G
hu: E128, Vörös 2G, Red 2G
it: E128, Rosso 2G
lt: E128, E128 food additive
lv: E128, E128 food additive
mt: E128, E128 food additive
nl: E128, Rood 2G, CI 18050
pl: E128, Czerwień 2G
pt: E128, Vermelho 2G, E128 Vermelho 2G
ro: E128, Roșu 2G
sk: E128, E128 food additive
sl: E128, E128 food additive
sv: E128, Röd 2G, E 128

en: E129, Allura red, Allura red ac, Allura Red AC, FD&C Red 40, FD and C Red 40, Red 40, Red no40, Red no. 40, FD and C Red no. 40, Food Red 17, C.I. 16035, Red 40 lake
xx: E129
bg: E129, Алура червено ac
ca: E129, Vermell Allure 2C, Vermell allura AC
cs: E129, Allura red ac, červeň ac, Červeň Allura AC
da: E129, Allura red ac
de: E129, Allurarot ac, Allurarot, E 129
el: E129, Ερυθρο allura ac
es: E129, Rojo allura ac, E 129, Rojo Allura 2C, rojo FD&C 40, rojo 40, rojo allura
et: E129, Võlupunane ac
fi: E129, Alluranpunainen ac, Alluranpunainen, E 129, CI 16035
fr: E129, Rouge allura AC, Rouge Allura, Rouge alimentaire 17, FD&C Rouge 40, Allura Red, Food Red 17, C.I. 16035, FD&C Red 40, Red 40 lake, Red 40, 2-naphthalenesulfonic acid disodium salt, Allura Red AC, C18H14N2Na2O8S2
hr: E129
hu: E129, Alluravörös AC, Allura Red AC
it: E129, Rosso allura ac
lt: E129, Alura raudonasis ac
lv: E129, Alūra sarkanais ac
mt: E129, Aħmar allura ac
nl: E129, Allurarood ac, Allura rood AC, Allura Rood, CI 16035
pl: E129, Czerwień allura ac, Czerwień FD&C, Czerwień Allura
pt: E129, Vermelho allura ac
ro: E129, Roșu allura ac
sk: E129, Červená allura ac
sl: E129, Alura rdeče ac
sv: E129, Allurarött ac, E 129

en: E130, Indanthrene blue RS, Indanthrone blue, indanthrene
xx: E130
bg: E130, Индантрен син RS, Индантрон син, индантрен
ca: E130, Blau d'antraquinona, Blau d'indantrena, indantrena
cs: E130, Indantronová modř RS, Indantronová modř, indantron
da: E130, Indanthrenblå RS, Indanthronblå, indanthren
de: E130, Indanthron, Indanthrenblau RS, Indanthronblau, indanthren
el: E130, Ινδανθρένιο μπλε RS, Ινδανθρένιο μπλε, ινδανθρένιο
es: E130, Azul indantreno RS, Azul indantreno, indantreno
et: E130, Indantreen sinine RS, Indantreen sinine, indantreen
fi: E130, Indantreenisininen RS, Indantreenisininen, indantreen
fr: E130, Manascorubine, Bleu d'indanthrène, Bleu indanthrène RS, Bleu indanthrone, indanthrène
hu: E130, Indantrénkék RS, Indantrénkék, indantrén
it: E130, Blu indantrene RS, Blu indantrene, indantrene
lt: E130, Indantreno mėlyna RS, Indantreno mėlyna, indantreno
lv: E130, Indantrena zila RS, Indantrena zila, indantrena
mt: E130, Blu indantren RS, Blu indantren, indantren
nl: E130, Indantronblauw RS, Indantronblauw, indantron
pl: E130, Błękit indantrenowy RS, Niebieski indantren RS, Niebieski indantren, indantren
pt: E130, Azul indantreno RS, Azul indantreno, indantreno
ro: E130, Albastru indantren RS, Albastru indantren, indantren
sk: E130, Indantronová modrá RS, Indantronová modrá, indantron
sl: E130, Indantrensko modro RS, Indantrensko modro, indantren
sv: E130, Indantrenblå RS, Indantrenblå, indantren

en: E131, Patent blue v, Food Blue 5, Sulphan Blue, Acid Blue 3, L-Blau 3, C-Blau 20, Patentblau V, Sky Blue, C.I. 42051
xx: E131
bg: E131, Патент синьо v
ca: E131, Blau patentat V
cs: E131, Patentní modř v
da: E131, Patent blue v
de: E131, Patentblau V, Patentblau, patentblau E 131
el: E131, Πατεντ μπλε v
es: E131, Azul patentado V, Azul patente v, Azul sulfán
et: E131, Patentsinine v
fi: E131, Patenttisininen v, Patenttisininen, CI 42051
fr: E131, Bleu patenté V, bleu CI n°5, bleu patenté E 131
ga: E131, gorm paitinne V
he: E131, פטנט כחול V
hu: E131, Patentkék V
it: E131, Blu patentato v, blu patentato, blu patentato E 131
lt: E131, Mėlynasis patentuotas v
lv: E131, Patentzilais v
mt: E131, Patent blue v
nl: E131, Patentblauw v, Patentblauw
pl: E131, Błękit patentowy v
pt: E131, Azul patenteado v
ro: E131, Albastru patent v
ru: E131, синий патентованный V
sk: E131, Patentná modrá v
sl: E131, Patentno modro v
sv: E131, Patentblått v, E 131
uk: E131, Синій патентований V
zh: E131, 專利藍V

en: E132, Indigotine, indigo carmine, FD&C Blue 2, FD and C Blue 2, C.I. Food Blue 2, Blue 2 lake, Blue 2
xx: E132
bg: E132, Индиготин, индиго кармин
ca: E132, Indigotina, carmí indi, carmi indi
cs: E132, Indigotin, indigocarmine, Indigo karmín
da: E132, Indigotin (indigocarmin)
de: E132, Indigotin (Indigokarmin), Indigokarmin, Indigotin, E 132, Indigocarmin, Indigotin I
el: E132, Ινδικοτινη, ινδικοκαρμινη
es: E132, Indigotina, carmín de índigo, E 132, azul FD&C 2
et: E132, Indigotiin, indigokarmiin
fi: E132, Indigotiini, indigokarmiini, indigootti
fr: E132, Indigotine carmin d'indigo, carmin d'indigo, C16H8N2Na2O8S2, Acide indigodisulfonique, Acide indigosulfonique, 860-22-0
hu: E132, Indigotin, indigókármin
it: E132, Indigotina, carminio d'indaco
lt: E132, Indigotinas, indigokarminas
lv: E132, Indigotīns, indigokarmīns
mt: E132, Indigotina, karminju indigo
nl: E132, Indigotine, indigokarmijn
pl: E132, Indygotyna, indygokarmin
pt: E132, Indigotina, carmim de indigo, Índigo-carmim
ro: E132, Indigotină, carmin indigo
sk: E132, Indigotín, indigokarmín
sl: E132, Indigotin, indigo karmin
sv: E132, Indigotin, indigokarmin

en: E133, Brilliant blue FCF, FD&C Blue 1, FD and C Blue 1, Blue 1, fd&c blue no. 1, Blue 1 lake
xx: E133
bg: E133, Брилянтно синьо FCF
ca: E133, Blau brillant FCF
cs: E133, Brilantní modř FCF
da: E133, Brilliant blue FCF, brillant blue
de: E133, Brilliantblau FCF, Brillantblau FCF, E 133, Brillantblau
el: E133, Λαμπρο κυανο FCF
es: E133, Azul brillante FCF, Azul brillante FCP, E 133, Brilliant Blue FCF, azul FD&C 1, azul brillante
et: E133, Briljantsinine FCF
fi: E133, Briljanttisininen FCF
fr: E133, Bleu brillant FCF, C.I. Acid Blue 9, CI 42090, C-Blau 21, Erioglaucin A, Blue 1, Brilliant Blue FCF, bleu brillant, FD&C Blue No.1, FD&C Blue #1, BB FCF, Acid Blue 9, D&C Blue No. 4, Alzen Food Blue No. 1, Atracid Blue FG, Erioglaucine, Eriosky blue, Patent Blue AR, Xylene Blue VSG, CAS 25305-78-6, CAS 2650-18-2, CAS 3844-45-9, CAS 71701-18-3, CAS 15792-67-3, 2650-18-2, 15792-67-3
ga: E133, gorm lonrach FCF
he: E133, כחול בוהק FCF
hr: E133, briljantna plava
hu: E133, Brilliánskék FCF
id: E133, Brilliant Blue FCF
it: E133, Blu brillante FCF
ja: E133, ブリリアントブルーFCF
lt: E133, Briliantinis mėlinasis FCF, Briliantinis mėlynasis FCF
lv: E133, Briljantzilais FCF
mt: E133, Blu brillanti FCF
nb: E133, briljantblà FCF
nl: E133, Briljantblauw FCF, Briljantblauw
pl: E133, Błękit brylantowy FCF, Błękit brylantowy
pt: E133, Azul brilhante FCF
ro: E133, Albastru briliant FCF
sh: E133, Brilijantno plavo FCF
sk: E133, Brilantná modrá FCF
sl: E133, Briljantno modro FCF
sr: E133, Brilijantno plavo FCF
sv: E133, Briljantblått FCF, Briljantblått
uk: E133, Діамантовий синій

en: E140, Chlorophylls and Chlorophyllins
xx: E140
bg: E140, Хлорофили и Хлорофилини
ca: E140, Clorofil·les i Clorofil·lines
cs: E140, Chlorofyly a Chlorofylliny
da: E140, Chlorophyller og Chlorophylliner
de: E140, Chlorophylle und Chlorophylline
el: E140, Χλωροφύλλες και Χλωροφυλλίνες
es: E140, Clorofilas y Clorofilinas
et: E140, Klorofüllid ja Klorofülliinid
fi: E140, Klorofyllit ja Klorofylliinit, Klorofyllejä ja Klorofylliinejä
fr: E140, Chlorophylles et Chlorophyllines
hr: E140, Klorofili i Klorofilini
hu: E140, Klorofillok és Klorofillinek
it: E140, Clorofille e Clorofilline
lt: E140, Chlorofilai ir Chlorofilinai
lv: E140, Hlorofili un Hlorofilīni
mt: E140, Klorofilli u Klorofillini
nl: E140, Chlorofylen en Chlorofyllinen
pl: E140, Chlorofile i Chlorofiliny
pt: E140, Clorofilas e Clorofilinas
ro: E140, Clorofile și Clorofilini
sk: E140, Chlorofyly a Chlorofyllíny
sl: E140, Klorofili in Klorofilini
sv: E140, Klorofyller och Klorofylliner

en: E140(i), Chlorophylls, CI Natural Green 3, Magnesium Chlorophyll, chlorophyll
xx: E140(i)
ar: E140(i), يخضور
az: E140(i), Xlorofil
ba: E140(i), Хлорофилл
be: E140(i), Хларафіл
bg: E140(i), Хлорофили, CI натурално зелено 3, магнезиев хлорофил
bn: E140(i), ক্লোরোফিল
bs: E140(i), Hlorofil
ca: E140(i), clorofilla
cs: E140(i), Chlorofyly, CI přírodní zeleň 3, chlorofyl hořčíku
cy: E140(i), Cloroffyl
da: E140(i), Chlorophyll, CI Natural Green 3
de: E140(i), Chlorophylle
el: E140(i), Χλωροφυλλες, Πράσινο CI natural 3, μαγνησιοχλωροφύλλη
eo: E140(i), klorofilo
es: E140(i), Clorofilas, CI Natural Green 3, clorofila magnésica
et: E140(i), Klorofüllid, CI looduslik roheline 3, magneesiumklorofüll
eu: E140(i), Klorofila
fa: E140(i), سبزینه
fi: E140(i), Klorofyllit, Klorofyllejä, CI Natural Green 3, Magnesiumklorofylli, Magnesiumklorofylliä
fr: E140(i), Chlorophylles, Phéophytine au magnésium, Chlorophylle, Chlorophylles magnésium, Vert naturel CI n°3, Vert naturel C. I. no 3, chlorophylle au magnésium
ga: E140(i), Clóraifill
gl: E140(i), Clorofila
gu: E140(i), હરિતદ્રવ્ય
he: E140(i), כלורופיל
hi: E140(i), पर्ण हरिम
hr: E140(i), Klorofil, bojilo klorofili
ht: E140(i), Klowofil
hu: E140(i), Klorofillok, CI Natural Green 3, Magnézium-klorofill
hy: E140(i), Քլորոֆիլ
id: E140(i), Klorofil
io: E140(i), Klorofilo
it: E140(i), Clorofille, CI verde naturale 3, clorofilla magnesiaca
ja: E140(i), クロロフィル
jv: E140(i), Klorofil
ka: E140(i), ქლოროფილი
kk: E140(i), Хлорофилл
kn: E140(i), ಕ್ಲೋರೊಫಿಲ್
ko: E140(i), 엽록소
ku: E140(i), Klorofîl
ky: E140(i), Хлорофилл
la: E140(i), Chlorophyllum
lt: E140(i), Chlorofilai, Natūralus žaliasis CI Nr. 3, magnio chlorofilas
lv: E140(i), Hlorofili, CI dabīgais zaļais 3, magnija hlorofils
mk: E140(i), Хлорофил
ml: E140(i), ഹരിതകം
mr: E140(i), हरितद्रव्य
ms: E140(i), Klorofil
mt: E140(i), Klorofilli, CI Natural Green 3, Manjeżju Klorofill
nb: E140(i), Klorofyll
ne: E140(i), हरितकण
nl: E140(i), Chlorofylen, CI Natural Green 3, Magnesiumchlorofyl
oc: E140(i), Clorofilla
pl: E140(i), Chlorofile, CI zieleń naturalna 3, chlorofil magnezowy
pt: E140(i), Clorofilas, Verde natural CI 3, clorofila de magnésio
qu: E140(i), Raphi q'umir
ro: E140(i), Clorofile, Verde natural CI 3, Clorofilă de magneziu
sh: E140(i), Hlorofil
sk: E140(i), Chlorofyly, CI prírodná zelená 3, horečnatý chlorofyl
sl: E140(i), Klorofili, CI Natural Green 3, magnezijev klorofil
sq: E140(i), Klorofili
sr: E140(i), хлорофил
su: E140(i), Kloropil
sv: E140(i), Klorofyller, CI Natural Green 3, magnesiumklorofyll
sw: E140(i), Klorofili
ta: E140(i), பச்சையம்
te: E140(i), పత్రహరితం
th: E140(i), คลอโรฟิลล์
tr: E140(i), Klorofil
uk: E140(i), Хлорофіл
vi: E140(i), Diệp lục
wa: E140(i), Clorofile
zh: E140(i), 叶绿素

en: E140(ii), Chlorophyllins, CI Natural Green 5, Sodium Chlorophyllin
xx: E140(ii)
bg: E140(ii), Хлорофилини, CI натурално зелено 5, натриев хлорофилин
cs: E140(ii), Chlorofyliny, CI přírodní zeleň 5, chlorofylin sodíku
da: E140(ii), Chlorophylliner, CI Natural Green 5, natriumchlorophyllin
de: E140(ii), Chlorophylline
el: E140(ii), Χλωροφυλλινες, Πράσινο CI natural 5, χλωροφυλλινικό νάτριο
es: E140(ii), Clorofilinas, CI Natural Green 5, clorofilina sódica
et: E140(ii), Klorofülliinid, CI looduslik roheline 5, naatriumklorofülliin
fi: E140(ii), Klorofylliinit, Klorofylliinejä, CI Natural Green 5, Natriumklorofylliini, Natriumklorofylliiniä
fr: E140(ii), Chlorophyllines, sels basiques des chlorophyllines, Vert naturel CI no5, Vert naturel CI n°5, chlorophylline sodique, chlorophylline potassique, Vert naturel C. I. no 5
hu: E140(ii), Klorofillinek, CI Natural Green 5, Nátrium-klorofillin
it: E140(ii), Clorofilline, CI verde naturale 5, clorofillina di sodio
lt: E140(ii), Chlorofilinai, Natūralus žaliasis CI Nr. 5, natrio chlorofilinas
lv: E140(ii), Hlorofilīni, CI dabīgais zaļais 5, nātrija hlorofilīns
mt: E140(ii), Klorofillini, CI Natural Green 5, Klorofillin tas-Sodju
nl: E140(ii), Chlorofylinen, CI Natural Green 5, natriumchlorofyline
pl: E140(ii), Chlorofiliny, CI zieleń naturalna 5, chlorofilina sodowa
pt: E140(ii), Clorofilinas, Verde natural CI 5, clorofilina de sódio
ro: E140(ii), Clorofiline, Verde natural CI 5, Clorofilină sodică
sk: E140(ii), Chlorofylíny, CI prírodná zelená 5, sodný chlorofylín
sl: E140(ii), Klorofilini, CI Natural Green 5, natrijev klorofilin
sv: E140(ii), Klorofylliner, CI Natural Green 5, natriumklorofyllin

en: E141, Copper complexes of chlorophylls and chlorophyllins, Copper complexes of chlorophyll and chlorophyllins
xx: E141
bg: E141, E141 food additive
ca: E141, Complexos cúprics de clorofil i clorofilines
cs: E141, Mědnaté komplexy chlorofylů a chlorofylinů
da: E141, E141 food additive
de: E141, Kupferhaltigen Komplexe der Chlorophylle und Chlorophylline, Kupferhaltige Komplexe der Chlorophylle und Chlorophylline
el: E141, E141 food additive
es: E141, Complejos cúpricos de clorofilas y clorofilinas
et: E141, E141 food additive
fi: E141, Klorofylliinikuparikompleksit ja Klorofylli-kuparikompleksi, Klorofylli-kuparikompleksia ja Klorofylliinikuparikomplekseja
fr: E141, Complexe cuivrique des chlorophylles et des chlorophyllines
hr: E141  bojilo bakreni kompleksi klorofila i klorofilina, bakreni kompleksi klorofila i klorofilina, klorofili i bakreni kompleksi klorofilina
hu: E141, Klorofillok és klorofillinek rézkomplexei, klorofill-rezkomplexek és klorofillin-rézkomplexek
it: E141, Complessi rameici delle clorofille e delle clorofilline, Complessi rameici della clorofilla e delle clorofilline
lt: E141, E141 food additive
lv: E141, E141 food additive
mt: E141, E141 food additive
nl: E141, Kopercomplexen van chlorophyllen
pl: E141, Kompleksy miedziowe chlorofili i chlorofilin
pt: E141, E141 food additive
ro: E141, Complexe de cupru ale clorofilelor și clorofilinei
rs: E141, bakreni kompleksi klorofila i klorofilina
sk: E141, E141 food additive
sl: E141, E141 food additive, bakrovi kompleksi klorofilov in klorofilinov
sv: E141, E141 food additive

en: E141(i), Copper complexes of chlorophylls, CI Natural Green 3, Copper Chlorophyll
xx: E141(i)
bg: E141(i), Медни комплекси на хлорофили, CI натурално зелено 3, меден хлорофил
cs: E141(i), Měďnaté komplexy chlorofylů, CI přírodní zeleň 3, chlorofyl mědi
da: E141(i), Chlorophyll-kobber-kompleks, CI Natural Green 3
de: E141(i), Kupferkomplexe der Chlorophylle
el: E141(i), Συμπλοκα των χλωροφυλλων με χαλκο, Πράσινο CI natural 3, χαλκοχλωροφύλλη
es: E141(i), Complejos cúpricos de clorofilas, CI Natural Green 3, clorofila cúprica
et: E141(i), Klorofüllide vasekompleksid, CI looduslik roheline 3, vaskklorofüll
fi: E141(i), Klorofyllikuparikompleksit, Klorofyllikuparikomplekseja, CI Natural Green 3, Kupariklorofylli, Kupariklorofylliä
fr: E141(i), Complexes cuivriques de chlorophylles, Vert naturel C. I. no 3, chlorophylle cuivrique, complexes cuivre-chlorophylles
hu: E141(i), Klorofillok rézkomplexei, CI Natural Green 3, Réz-klorofill
it: E141(i), Complessi rameici delle clorofille, CI verde naturale 3, clorofilla rameica
lt: E141(i), Chlorofilų vario kompleksiniai junginiai, Natūralus žaliasis CI Nr. 3, vario chlorofilas
lv: E141(i), Hlorofilu vara kompleksi, CI dabīgais zaļais 3, vara hlorofils
mt: E141(i), Kumplessi tar-ram tal-klorofilli, CI Natural Green 3, Klorofill tar-Ram
nl: E141(i), Kopercomplexen van chlorofylen, CI Natural Green 3, koperchlorofyl
pl: E141(i), Kompleksy miedziowe chrolofili, CI zieleń naturalna 3, chlorofil miedziowy
pt: E141(i), Complexos cúpricos de clorofilas, Verde natural CI 3, clorofila cúprica
ro: E141(i), Complexe de cupru ale clorofilelor, Verde natural CI 3, Clorofilă de cupru
sk: E141(i), Meďnaté komplexy chlorofylov, CI prírodná zelená 3, meďnatý chlorofyl
sl: E141(i), Bakrovi kompleksi klorofilov, CI Natural Green 3, bakrov klorofil
sv: E141(i), Kopparkomplex av klorofyller, CI Natural Green 3, kopparklorofyll, Klorofyllkopparkomplex

en: E141(ii), Copper complexes of chlorophyllins, Sodium Copper Chlorophyllin, Potassium Copper Chlorophyllin, Copper Chlorophyllin
xx: E141(ii)
bg: E141(ii), Медни комплекси на хлорофилини, Натриев меден хлорофилин, калиев меден хлорофилин
cs: E141(ii), Měďnaté komplexy chlorofylinů
da: E141(ii), Chlorophyllin-kobber-kompleks, Natriumkobberchlorophyllin, kaliumkobberchlorophyllin
de: E141(ii), Kupferkomplexe der Chlorophylline
el: E141(ii), Συμπλοκα των χλωροφυλλινων με χαλκο, Χαλκοχλωροφυλλινικό νάτριο, χαλκοχλωροφυλλινικό κάλιο
es: E141(ii), Complejos cúpricos de clorofilinas, Clorofilina cúprica de sodio, clorofilina cúprica de potasio
et: E141(ii), Klorofülliinide vasekompleksid, Naatriumvaskklorofülliin, kaaliumvaskklorofülliin
fi: E141(ii), Klorofylliinikuparikompleksit, Natriumkupariklorofylliini, Kaliumkupariklorofylliini, Klorofylliinikuparikomplekseja, Natriumkupariklorofylliiniä, Kaliumkupariklorofylliiniä
fr: E141(ii), Sels de sodium et de potassium de complexes cupriques de chlorophyllines, Complexe cuivrique des chlorophyllines avec sels de sodium et de potassium, Cuivre phaeophytin a, Cuivre phaeophytin b, complexes cuivre-chlorophyllines, laque aluminique de chlorophylline, cuivre - chlorophyllines, cuivre-chlorophyllines
hr: E141(ii)
hu: E141(ii), Klorofillinek rézkomplexei, Nátrium-réz-klorofillin, Kálium-réz-klorofillin
it: E141(ii), Complessi rameici delle clorofilline
lt: E141(ii), Chlorofilinų vario kompleksiniai junginiai, Natrio-vario chlorofilinas, kalio-vario chlorofilinas
lv: E141(ii), Hlorofilīnu vara kompleksi, Nātrija vara hlorofilīns, kālija vara hlorofilīns
mt: E141(ii), Kumplessi tar-ram tal-klorofillini
nl: E141(ii), Kopercomplexen van chlorofylinen, Natriumkoperchlorofyline, kaliumkoperchlorofyline
pl: E141(ii), Kompleksy miedziowe chlorofilin
pt: E141(ii), Complexos cúpricos de clorofilinas
ro: E141(ii), Complexe de cupru ale clorofilinelor
sk: E141(ii), Meďnaté komplexy chlorofylínov
sl: E141(ii), Bakrovi kompleksi klorofilinov, natrijev bakrov klorofilin, kalijev bakrov klorofilin
sv: E141(ii), Kopparkomplex av klorofylliner, natriumkopparklorofyllin

en: E142, Green s, CI Food Green 4
xx: E142
bg: E142, Зелено s, CI хранително зелено 4
ca: E142, Verd àcid brillant BS, verd lisamina
cs: E142, Zeleň s, CI potravinářská zeleň 4
da: E142, Green s, CI Food Green 4
de: E142, Grün s, Food Green 4, E 142, Brillantsäuregrün BS, Brillantsäuregrün
el: E142, Πρασινο s, Πράσινο CI food 4
es: E142, Verde s, CI Food Green 4, Green S, Verde ácido brillante BS, Verde lisamina
et: E142, Roheline s, CI roheline toiduvärv 4
fa: E142, سبز اس
fi: E142, Vihreä s, Briljanttivihreä, CI Food Green 4
fr: E142, Vert acide brillant BS, Vert lissamine, Vert s
ga: E142, uaine aigéadach lonrach BS
he: E142, ירוק S
hu: E142, Zöld S, CI Food Green 4
it: E142, Verde s, CI verde per alimenti 4, C27H25N2O7S2Na, Verde Brillante BS
lt: E142, Žaliasis s, Maistinis žaliasis CI Nr. 4, Maisto žaliasis S
lv: E142, Zaļais s, CI Pārtikas zaļais 4
mt: E142, Aħdar s
nl: E142, Groen s, CI Food Green 4, Briljantzuurgroen BS
pl: E142, Zieleń s, CI zieleń spożywcza 4, Zieleń brylantowa BS
pt: E142, Verde s, Verde alimentar CI 4
ro: E142, Verde s, Colorant alimentar verde CI 4
ru: E142, Зелёный S
sh: E142, Zeleno S
sk: E142, Zelená s, CI potravinárska zelená 4
sl: E142, Zeleno s, CI Food Green 4
sr: E142, Zeleno S
sv: E142, Grön s, CI Food Green 4, E 142
uk: E142, Зелений S

en: E143, Fast Green FCF, Food green 3, C.I. 42053, Solid Green FCF, Green 1724, FD&C Green No. 3, Green 3
xx: E143
bg: E143, E143 food additive
cs: E143, E143 food additive
da: E143, E143 food additive
de: E143, Fast Green FCF
el: E143, E143 food additive
es: E143, Verde rápido FCF, E 143
et: E143, E143 food additive
fi: E143, Nopea Vihreä FCF, Fast Green FCF, CI 42053
fr: E143, Vert solide FCF, C.I. 42053, Vert 1724
hu: E143, Fast Green FCF
it: E143, Verde rapido FCF
lt: E143, E143 food additive
lv: E143, E143 food additive
mt: E143, E143 food additive
nl: E143, Fast Green FCF
pl: E143, Zielony trwały FCF
pt: E143, Verde rápido, Verde rápido FCF
ro: E143, Verde solid FCF
sk: E143, E143 food additive
sl: E143, E143 food additive
sv: E143, E143 food additive

en: E150, Caramel
xx: E150
ar: E150, كراميل
be: E150, карамель
bg: E150, Карамел
ca: E150, Caramel
cs: E150, karamel
da: E150, Karamel
de: E150, Karamell, Caramel
el: E150, καραμέλα
eo: E150, karamelo
es: E150, Caramelo, Caramelina
et: E150, Karamell
eu: E150, Karamelu
fa: E150, کارامل
fi: E150, Karamelli
fr: E150, Caramel
ga: E150, Caramal
gl: Caramelo
he: E150, קרמל
hr: E150, karamel, karamela
hu: E150, Karamell
hy: E150, Կարամել
id: E150, Karamel
io: E150, Karamelo
is: E150, Karamella
it: E150, caramello
ja: E150, キャラメル, カラメル
ka: E150, კარამელი
kk: E150, Карамель
kn: E150, ಕ್ಯಾರಮೆಲ್
ko: E150, 캐러멜
ky: E150, Карамель
li: E150, Sjloek
lt: E150, Karamelė
lv: E150, karameles
mk: E150, Карамела
ms: E150, Karamel
mt: E150, E150 food additive
nb: E150, karamell
nl: E150, karamel, caramel
nn: E150, Karamell
oc: E150, caramèl
pl: E150, karmel, karmelowy, karmelowe, karmelowa, karmelu
pt: E150, caramelo
ro: E150, Carmel
ru: E150, карамель
sk: E150, Karamel
sl: E150, Karamel
sr: E150, Karamela
sv: E150, E150 food additive
ta: E150, கேரமல்
th: E150, คาราเมล
tl: E150, Karamelo
tr: E150, Karamel
uk: E150, карамель
ur: E150, محروق
uz: E150, Karamel
vi: E150, Nước caramen
zh: E150, 焦糖